dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="m/iskin__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iskin</l><r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sieken</l><r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/alil__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>alil</l><r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liel</l><r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ebbus__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ebbus</l><r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biebes</l><r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/erżieq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erżieq</l><r>erżieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieżaq</l><r>erżieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/erva__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erva</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riev</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prasp/ura__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ura</l><r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="for/ġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oġ</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/ewlaq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewlaq</l><r>ewlaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wielaq</l><r>ewlaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/erfux__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erfux</l><r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riefex</l><r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/aqq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aqq</l><r>aqq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>quq</l><r>aqq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kn/isja__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>isja</l><r>isja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjes</l><r>isja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħol/qa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>qa</l><r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oq</l><r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/aqqun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aqqun</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qaqan</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qaqen</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/addiena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>addiena</l><r>addiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dieden</l><r>addiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ieqja__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ieqja</l><r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieqi</l><r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/att__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>att</l><r>att<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tut</l><r>att<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ajf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ajf</l><r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juf</l><r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sod/da__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>da</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>od</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/enbil__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enbil</l><r>enbil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niebel</l><r>enbil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/aktur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aktur</l><r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>katar</l><r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te/ntufa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ntufa</l><r>ntufa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tnief</l><r>ntufa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="qot/na__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/okkiena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>okkiena</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kaken</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kieken</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/artell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artell</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rietel</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/elt__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>elt</l><r>elt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liet</l><r>elt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ajra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ajra</l><r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jur</l><r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ieqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ieqa</l><r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieqi</l><r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/ardell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ardell</l><r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riedel</l><r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/iswed__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>iswed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suwed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/engħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>engħa</l><r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>najja'</l><r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ewn__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewn</l><r>ewn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wien</l><r>ewn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/ifer__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ifer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>far</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/obż__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>obż</l><r>obż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bejjeż</l><r>obż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/arib__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arib</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raba</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieba</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="gerfux"><i>g</i><par n="g/erfux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="miskin"><i>m</i><par n="m/iskin__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="debbus"><i>d</i><par n="d/ebbus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baqqun"><i>b</i><par n="b/aqqun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żenbil"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/enbil__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xatt"><i>x</i><par n="x/att__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tentufa"><i>te</i><par n="te/ntufa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sodda"><i>sod</i><par n="sod/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għoqda"><i>għoq</i><par n="sod/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="iswed"><i></i><par n="/iswed__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="praspura"><i>prasp</i><par n="prasp/ura__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħobż"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/obż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tieqa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gardell"><i>g</i><par n="g/ardell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalil"><i>q</i><par n="q/alil__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġewlaq"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ewlaq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qotna"><i>qot</i><par n="qot/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forġa"><i>for</i><par n="for/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għodda"><i>għod</i><par n="sod/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xifer"><i>x</i><par n="x/ifer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dokkiena"><i>d</i><par n="d/okkiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bieqja"><i>b</i><par n="b/ieqja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xaqq"><i>x</i><par n="x/aqq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerva"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erva__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raddiena"><i>r</i><par n="r/addiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maktur"><i>m</i><par n="m/aktur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="martell"><i>m</i><par n="m/artell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="knisja"><i>kn</i><par n="kn/isja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tajra"><i>t</i><par n="t/ajra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċoqqa"><i>ċoq</i><par n="ħol/qa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="loġġa"><i>loġ</i><par n="for/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="werżieq"><i>w</i><par n="w/erżieq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="belt"><i>b</i><par n="b/elt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sengħa"><i>s</i><par n="s/engħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lewn"><i>l</i><par n="l/ewn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħolqa"><i>ħol</i><par n="ħol/qa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sajf"><i>s</i><par n="s/ajf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qarib"><i>q</i><par n="q/arib__n_GD"/></e>
